South Dakota, session 2026, SB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-25-1.3 be AMENDED:
1-25-1.3. The state shall provide public notice of a regular meeting by posting a
copy of the proposed agenda at:
(1) At the principal office of the board, commission, or department holding the
meeting; and
(2) On a state website designated by the commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and
Management.
The proposed agenda shall must include the date, time, and location of the
meeting, and be visible, readable, and accessible to the public. The agenda shall must be
posted as required in this section at least seventy-two hours before the meeting is
scheduled to start, according to the agenda. The seventy-two hours does not include
Saturday, Sunday, or any legal holidays. The notice shall also be posted on a state
website, designated by the commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and Management
holiday.
For any special or rescheduled meeting, the information in the notice shall must be
delivered in person, or by mail, by email, or by telephone, to members of the local news
media who have requested notice. For any special or rescheduled meeting, and the state
shall also comply with the must provide public notice provisions of as required in this
section for a regular meeting to the extent that circumstances permit.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.